src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_putestid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - navaliđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    navaliđ+V+Inf: navaliđ
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: navalâm
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: navalah
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navvaal
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: navaleen
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: navvaalvettee
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: navalává
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: navalep
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: navvaalvetteđ
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: navaleh
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: navalim
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: navalih
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: navalij
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: navaláim
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: navaláid
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: navaláin
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: navalijm
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: navalijd
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: navalii
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: navaliččim
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: navaliččih
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: navaličij
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: navaliččijm
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: navaliččijd
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: navaliččijn
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: navaliččijm
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: navaliččijd
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: navaliččii
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: navaližžeem
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: navaližžeeh
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: navališ
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: navaližžeen
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: navališvettee
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: navaližává
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: navaližžep
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: navališvetteđ
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: navaližeh

    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: navvaal
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: navalus
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: navaloon
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: navalee
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: navalus
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: navalop
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: navaliđ
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: navalus
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: navvaal
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: navalâm
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: navaliččii  
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: navaližžii
    navaliđ+V+PrsPrc: [navaleijee, navalijjee]
    navaliđ+V+PrfPrc: navalâm
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Nom: navalem
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Ess: navvaalmin
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Loc: navvaalmist
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Ill: navvaalmân
    navaliđ+V+Ger: navvaaldijn
    navaliđ+V+VAbess: navvaalhánnáá

  Verb - putásmiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    putásmiđ+V+Inf: putásmiđ
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: putásmâm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: putásmah
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puttáásm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: putásmeen
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: puttáásmvettee
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: putásmává
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: putásmep
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: puttáásmvetteđ
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: putásmeh
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: putásmim
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: putásmih
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: putásmij
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: putásmáim
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: putásmáid
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: putásmáin
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: putásmijm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: putásmijd
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: putásmii
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: putásmiččim
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: putásmiččih
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: putásmičij
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: putásmiččijm
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: putásmiččijd
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: putásmiččijn
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: putásmiččijm
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: putásmiččijd
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: putásmiččii
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: putásmižžeem
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: putásmižžeeh
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: putásmiš
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: putásmižžeen
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: putásmišvettee
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: putásmižává
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: putásmižžep
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: putásmišvetteđ
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: putásmižeh

    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: puttáásm
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: putásmus
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: putásmoon
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: putásmee
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: putásmus
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: putásmop
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: putásmiđ
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: putásmus
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puttáásm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: putásmâm
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: putásmiččii
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: putásmižžii
    putásmiđ+V+PrsPrc: [putásmeijee, putásmijjee]
    putásmiđ+V+PrfPrc: putásmâm
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Nom: putásmem
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Ess: puttáásmin # Twolc: sm + m => sm + 0
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Loc: puttáásmist # Twolc: sm + m => sm + 0
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Ill: puttáásmân # Twolc: sm + m => sm + 0
    putásmiđ+V+Ger: puttáásmdijn
    putásmiđ+V+VAbess: puttáásmhánnáá


  Verb - lasettiđ: # MLO, checked; this should probably be in another yaml but I will leave it here first for a while. Check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill 
    lasettiđ+V+Inf: lasettiđ
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lasettâm
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lasettah
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lasseet
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lasetteen
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: lasseetvettee
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: lasettává
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lasettep
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lasseetvetteđ
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lasetteh
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lasettim
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lasettih
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lasettij
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: lasettáim
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: lasettáid
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: lasettáin
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lasettijm
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lasettijd
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lasettii
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: lasettiččim
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: lasettiččih
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: lasettičij
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: lasettiččijm
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: lasettiččijd
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: lasettiččijn
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: lasettiččijm
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: lasettiččijd
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: lasettiččii
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: lasettižžeem
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: lasettižžeeh
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: lasettiš
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: lasettižžeen
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: lasettišvettee
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: lasettižává
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: lasettižžep
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: lasettišvetteđ
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: lasettižeh

    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lasseet
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: lasettus
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lasettoon
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lasettee
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lasettus
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: lasettop
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: lasettiđ
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lasettus
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lasseet 
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: lasettâm
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: lasettiččii 
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: lasettižžii
    lasettiđ+V+PrsPrc: [lasettijjee, lasetteijee]
    lasettiđ+V+PrfPrc: lasettâm
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Nom: lasettem
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Ess: lasseetmin
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Loc: lasseetmist
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Ill: lasseetmân
    lasettiđ+V+Ger: lasseetdijn
    lasettiđ+V+VAbess: lasseethánnáá
